Georgia, session 2025_26, SB186.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
It is the intent of the General Assembly:
(1) To assist Georgians who need the services of assisted living communities and larger
personal care homes in order to age in place without moving to a skilled nursing facility,
but don't have the financial resources to do so;
(2) To allow home and community based services funded under the Medicaid program
to be accessible to Georgians, in some instances when such services have been previously
prohibited by state law and policy;
S. B. 186
- 1 -

LC 62 0091
(3) To have the Department of Community Health initiate a program to allow such
persons to receive Medicaid home and community based services, but not room and
board, in assisted living communities, all personal care homes, and subsidized housing
when such facilities choose to be enrolled as Medicaid providers; and
(4) That such program enabled by this Act provide an opportunity for provider choice
to persons in need of home and community based services, such as residents in assisted
living communities who have exhausted the resources required for licensed assisted
living and persons living independently in their home or in subsidized housing who need
a higher level of care.
SECTION 2.
Article 1 of Chapter 7 of Title 31 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to
regulation of hospitals and related institutions, is amended in Code Section 31-7-12.2,
relating to regulation and licensing of assisted living communities, by revising subsection (i)
as follows:
"(i) An assisted living community shall not be permitted to enroll as a provider of medical
assistance, as defined in paragraph (6) of Code Section 49-4-141, or receive any funds
authorized or paid pursuant to Title XIX of the Social Security Act. Reserved."
SECTION 3.
Said article is further amended by adding a new Code section to read as follows:
"31-7-12.9.
(a) Unless otherwise prohibited by federal law or regulation, assisted living communities
and personal care homes shall be permitted to enroll as providers of medical assistance, as
defined in paragraph (6) of Code Section 49-4-141, and receive any funds authorized or
paid pursuant to Title XIX of the Social Security Act.
S. B. 186
- 2 -

LC 62 0091
(b) In order to implement the provisions of this Code section, the department shall convene
stakeholders and develop a model to allow assisted living communities and personal care
homes to enroll as providers of medical assistance, as defined in paragraph (6) of Code
Section 49-4-141, and receive any funds authorized or paid pursuant to Title XIX of the
Social Security Act.
(c) To implement the provisions of this Code section, the department shall submit a
Medicaid state plan amendment, waiver request, or amendment to an existing waiver to the
United States Department of Health and Human Services, as necessary, no later than
December 31, 2026."
SECTION 4.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 186
- 3 -